inc/flattened/verb_suffixes_flattened_glossing.lexc
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+1+Pl+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+2+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+2+Pl+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+2+Pl+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+2+Pl+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@D.Person.1@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aawaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>aa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Negation@@R.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Negation@@R.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>ini #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Person.3@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+3+4+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Person.3@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>inaa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Person.3@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+3+4+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Person.3@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>inaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Person.3@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+3+4+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Person.3@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>inaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Person.3@@R.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+%0+3+4+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@P.Inanimate.1@@R.Person.3@@R.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>n%>%>inaa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Dub+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Prt+%0+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>ban2ii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>naan2y1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>naan2y1%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>naan2y1%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>minaa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>%>dig #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>%>ban2i1 #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>%>dig%>%>en%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.2@@D.Inanimate@@D.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>%>ban2ii%>ag #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>an #;
@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@R.Person.3@+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4:@D.Order.Cnj@@R.Person@@P.Theme.Inv@@P.Negation.1@@R.Person.3@@D.Inanimate@@R.Person.3@%>%>igo%>%>sii%>%>waa%>%>dig%>%>en%>an #;
